District of Columbia statutes.
9-204.08

Proposal to name or rename to be submitted to affected property owners.

The person or persons who initiate a proposal to name or rename a street or alley in the District of Columbia shall submit in writing a copy of the proposal to each owner of property abutting the affected street or alley.

History

Mar. 10, 1983, D.C. Law 4-201, § 408, 30 DCR 148

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 7-458.